Indiana, session 2026, HB1429.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 34-11-2-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) This section only applies to an appraisal or
appraisal service performed after June 30, 2026.
(b) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Appraisal" means a real estate appraisal, appraisal
review, appraisal consulting, or other valuation or valuation
related service performed by a real estate appraiser or an
appraisal management company.
(2) "Appraisal management company" means an appraisal
management company registered under IC 25-34.1.
(3) "Appraisal service date" means the date:
(A) stated on the appraisal report; or
(B) on which an appraisal or appraisal service was
performed or should have been performed under the terms
of the engagement.
(4) "Civil action" means a civil action or proceeding,
including a civil action in contract, tort, negligence,
misrepresentation, or consumer protection. However, the
term does not include:
(A) a civil action or proceeding based on:
HEA 1429

2
(i) intentional fraud; or
(ii) willful misconduct, including deliberate
misrepresentation, concealment, or other intentional
wrongful acts; or
(B) a licensing, disciplinary, or administrative enforcement
action under IC 25-34.1 or any other law.
(5) "Real estate appraiser" means a real estate appraiser
licensed or certified under IC 25-34.1.
(c) A civil action may not be brought against a real estate
appraiser or appraisal management company for damages or other
relief arising out of, based upon, or relating to an appraisal or
appraisal service unless the civil action is commenced not later
than five (5) years after the appraisal service date.
HEA 1429

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1429